Utah statutes.
4-29-6.   Enforcement -- Inspection of premises where poultry raised.
(1) The department shall have access to all hatcheries or other places in the
state where poultry is raised for the purpose of inspecting the premises for
conditions related to the control of pullorum or other poultry disease.
(2)  If admittance is refused, the department may proceed immediately to
obtain an ex parte warrant from the nearest court of competent jurisdiction to
allow entry upon the premises for the purpose of making the inspection.
